Idaho, session 2025, H0286.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-1707, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1707. MEMBERSHIP. The board of pharmacy shall consist of five (5)
seven (7) members who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the
governor. One (1) member shall be a representative of the public, one (1)
member shall be a certified registered pharmacy technician who possesses the
qualifications specified in section 54-1708, Idaho Code, and four (4) five
(5) members shall be licensed pharmacists who possess the qualifications
specified in section 54-1708, Idaho Code. The board of pharmacy shall have
diverse pharmacy practice experience, with at least one (1) member having
substantial experience in community pharmacy and at least one (1) member
having substantial experience in hospital pharmacy.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-1708, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1708. QUALIFICATIONS OF BOARD MEMBERS. (1) The public member of the
board of pharmacy shall be a resident of the state of Idaho who has attained
the age of majority and shall not be nor shall he ever have been a member of
the profession of pharmacy, the spouse of a member of the profession of phar-
macy, or a person who has or has had a material financial interest in provid-
ing pharmacy service or any other activity directly related to the practice
of pharmacy.
(2) The pharmacist members of the board of pharmacy shall at the time of
their appointment and at all times thereafter:
(a) Be residents of the state of Idaho;
(b) Be licensed and in good standing to engage in the practice of phar-
macy in the state of Idaho;
(c) Be engaged in the practice of pharmacy in the state of Idaho; and
(d) Have five (5) years of experience in the practice of pharmacy in the
state of Idaho after licensure.
(3) The certified registered pharmacy technician member of the board of
pharmacy shall at the time of appointment and at all times thereafter:
(a) Be a resident of the state of Idaho;


(b) Be registered and in good standing to engage in the practice of
pharmacy in the state of Idaho;
(c) Be engaged in the practice of pharmacy in the state of Idaho;
(d) Have three (3) years of experience in the practice of pharmacy in
the state of Idaho after registration; and
(e) Maintain a current certified pharmacy technician designation.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.